Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2416.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 5215YH (2) 91 da/js H.F. 2416 Section 1. Section 459.102, subsection 15, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 15. âConfinement feeding operationâ means an animal feeding 3 operation in which animals are confined to areas which that are 4 totally or partially roofed. 5 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 459.104 Moratorium ââ confinement 6 feeding operation structures. 7 1. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or any 8 other provision of law to the contrary, a person shall not 9 construct, including expand, a confinement feeding operation 10 structure. 11 2. Subsection 1 does not apply to a confinement feeding 12 operation structure that is part of a small animal feeding 13 operation. 14 3. This section does not prohibit a person from completing 15 construction, including expansion, of a confinement feeding 16 operation structure if, prior to the effective date of this 17 Act, the person has begun construction, including expansion, 18 of the confinement feeding operation structure as otherwise 19 allowed under this chapter. 20 4. a. When the department of natural resources determines 21 there are fewer than one hundred water bodies in Iowa included 22 on the section 303(d) list of impaired waters as provided in 23 sections 455B.193 through 455B.195, the department shall submit 24 that determination as a notice for publication in the Iowa 25 administrative bulletin not later than thirty days after making 26 that determination. 27 b. This section is repealed thirty days after the 28 publication date of the issue of the Iowa administrative 29 bulletin that includes the notice described in paragraph âaâ . 30 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 31 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 32